Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 7. Wyoming Higher Education Assistance Authority

Cross references. —

As to an educational assistance plan for national guard members, see §

19-9-501

et seq.

§ 21-16-701.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “Wyoming Higher Education Assistance Authority Act.”

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-702.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Authority” means the Wyoming higher education assistance authority;

“Board” means the board of directors of the authority;

“College” means any accredited institution offering higher education;

“Financial institution” means any banking corporation or institution engaged primarily in lending or investing funds and authorized to do business in the state;

“Higher education” means any program, curriculum or combination of courses or subjects generally accepted as necessary to fulfill requirements for the attainment of a predetermined and identified educational, professional or vocational objective higher than graduation from high school;

“Obligations” means notes, warrants, bonds, temporary bonds and anticipation notes issued by the authority pursuant to this article;

“State” means the state of Wyoming;

“State agency” means any office or instrumentality of the state;

“Student” means:

Any person who, while a resident of the state, applies to a financial institution for a student loan and who is enrolled in a college or whose application for enrollment has been accepted by a college;

Any person who is enrolled in a college located within the state or whose application for enrollment has been accepted by a college located within the state;

To the extent funding is available after taking into consideration the aggregate funding needs of students specified under subparagraphs (a)(ix)(A) and (B) of this section, any person who is enrolled in a college located outside of this state; or

The parent or legal guardian of a student as defined under this paragraph.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-16-703.
Wyoming higher education assistance authority; creation; termination; board of directors; composition; compensation; meetings; surety bonds; personal liability; fiscal control.

The Wyoming higher education assistance authority is established as a body corporate to operate as a state instrumentality solely for the public benefit. The authority shall exist perpetually or until terminated by law. Unless adequate provision has been made for payment, no termination of the authority shall take effect if the authority has obligations outstanding. Upon termination, all rights and properties of the authority shall pass to and be vested in the state.

The board of directors of the authority is created and shall consist of nine (9) directors as follows:

The governor;

The state treasurer;

Seven (7) directors appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of whom shall be of the same political party.

Appointed directors shall serve for staggered terms of four (4) years each and shall not serve more than two (2) successive four (4) year terms. An appointed director may be removed from office by the governor pursuant to W.S. 9-1-202(a) or by a majority vote of the senate. Directors shall continue in office until their successors are appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs, the governor shall in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

, appoint a successor. The board shall select one (1) of its members to serve as chairman and one (1) member to serve as treasurer. Each appointed director shall receive compensation for each day or part of a day in which engaged in the performance of their official duties at the same rate provided members of the state legislature under W.S.

28-5-101

and shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

The board shall determine the date, time, place and method of notice for all regular meetings of the board. A majority of the directors constitutes a quorum for the transaction of any business or the exercise of any power or function of the authority. All matters shall be decided by a majority vote of the voting members of the board. Minutes of board meetings shall be kept, maintained and open to members of the public. Public notice of meetings shall be given prior to the meetings and meetings shall be open to the public in accordance with W.S.

16-4-401

through

16-4-408

. In emergency circumstances, if so determined by two-thirds (2/3) of its members, the board may take action by conference telephone or similar electronic communications equipment whereby all persons participating in the meeting can hear each other at the same time. Such action shall be recorded, immediately transcribed as minutes of the board and notice given of their availability for public review. The finding by the board that an emergency exists shall be binding and conclusive unless clearly erroneous.

The authority shall execute and maintain at its expense a blanket surety bond covering each director, the executive director and employees or other officers of the authority in a penal sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00). The directors, the executive director, employees or any other person executing obligations shall not be subject to any personal liability by reason of their issuance.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1; 2005, ch. 194, § 2; ch. 242, § 2; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 194, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “16-4-408” for “16-4-407” in (d).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 242, § 2, in (b)(i) and (b)(ii) deleted “or his designated representative.”

Laws 2005, ch. 242, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%)” for “four (4)” in (b)(iii).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “than” in the current phrase “not more than”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 2, states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 21-16-704.
Executive director; employment of additional personnel; compensation.

The board may appoint an executive director to serve as executive secretary to the board and as the chief executive officer of the authority. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board and shall receive a salary established by the board.

Subject to approval of the board and in accordance with W.S.

21-16-720

, the executive director shall determine the terms of employment, tenure, duties, working conditions, promotion and termination of other employees necessary to carry out the purposes and functions of the authority. Employees of the authority may be covered by and subject to the Wyoming Retirement Act, the State Employees and Officials Group Insurance Act and the Wyoming Deferred Compensation Act.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

State Employees and Official Group Insurance Act. —

See §§

9-3-202

, 9-3-203(a)(xi).

Wyoming Deferred Compensation Act. —

The Wyoming Deferred Compensation Act, referred to in the last sentence in subsection (b), apparently means §

9-3-501

et seq.

Wyoming Retirement Act. —

The Wyoming Retirement Act, referred to in subsection (b), may be found at §§

9-3-401

through

9-3-432

.

§ 21-16-705.
Powers and duties generally; preference to state financial institutions.

For the purposes of this article, the authority may:

Sue and be sued and procure necessary liability insurance;

Have a seal;

Make and execute contracts and other instruments;

Adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act for its organization, for special meetings of the board, for internal management and administration of its loan program, operations, properties and facilities and as necessary to carry out this article;

Acquire or contract to acquire by grant, purchase, option or otherwise, real, personal or mixed property or any interest in property;

Prepare plans, specifications and cost estimates for the purchase, sale, acquisition or other financing of student loans and modify the plans, specifications, designs or estimates;

Provide advisory, consultive or educational services, technical assistance and advice to any person in order to carry out the purposes of the authority;

Borrow money and issue its negotiable obligations and provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

Mortgage or pledge any or all of its revenue and income and assign or pledge any of its assets for the payment of the principal and interest on any obligations issued and any agreements made in connection with the obligations;

Deposit or invest any funds of the authority as provided in W.S.

21-16-718

;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and any other assets and operations;

Engage the services of consultants on a contract basis for rendering professional, financial and technical assistance and advice;

Contract for and accept any gifts, grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid in any form from the federal government or any federal agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any other source and subject to this article, and pass through or otherwise comply with any terms and conditions;

Pursuant to this article and under terms and conditions as it prescribes, make student loans which may be insured or guaranteed by governmental or private entities;

Acquire present or contingent interests in student loans from financial institutions or other lending institutions pursuant to this article and under terms and conditions as the authority may prescribe;

Take, hold, expend and administer, from any source, any real property, personal property and monies, or any interest therein, and the income therefrom, either absolutely or in trust, for any purpose of this article. No obligation of the authority under this article shall be an obligation of the state nor shall any obligation of the authority be payable out of any monies except those provided under this article;

Issue obligations, the interest on which may or may not be exempt from federal income tax calculations;

Develop and administer all programs and perform all functions necessary or convenient to promote and facilitate the making of student loans and provide such other higher education loan assistance and services as the authority deems necessary or desirable;

Enter into loan servicing agreements with any financial institution, lending institution or servicer at reasonable fees; and

Consent to modification of the terms of any loan or contract to which the authority is a party, subject to any contract with the holders of its obligations.

In purchasing loans from or making loans to financial institutions pursuant to this article, the authority shall give preference to financial institutions authorized to do business within the state.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 21-16-706.
Revenue obligations; issuance.

Subject to W.S.

21-16-707

, the authority may issue bonds in principal amounts it deems necessary to provide sufficient funds for achieving any of its purposes, including the payment of interest and the establishment of reserves. All obligations issued under this article are deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of the state unless expressly stated to the contrary on the face of the obligations.

The principal of and interest and premium, if any, on the obligations shall be payable solely from the sources provided by this article for payment. The obligations of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at rates including variable rates, shall mature at times not to exceed twenty (20) years from their date, as determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the authority, at a price and under terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to issuance of the obligations.

The authority shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the obligations, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination of the obligations and the place of payment of principal and interest, which may be any financial institution or trust company within or without the state.

The authority may sell the obligations in any manner, either at public or private sale and for a price as it may determine will best effectuate the purposes of this article. The authority may pay legal fees, expenses, premiums and commissions which it finds necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance and sale.

The authority may provide for the issuance of its obligations to refund any of its outstanding obligations, including payment of any redemption premium and any interest or premium accrued or to accrue to the earliest or subsequent date of redemption, purchase or maturity of the obligations. Refunding shall be accomplished in the manner prescribed by W.S.

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

to the extent not inconsistent with this article.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-707.
Revenue obligations; amount authorized.

The authority may issue at one time or from time to time, and subject to the express approval of the governor after a public hearing following reasonable public notice, revenue obligations in an aggregate amount outstanding at any one time not to exceed one hundred twenty-five million dollars ($125,000,000.00).

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-708.
Revenue obligations; security.

In any resolution authorizing the issuance of obligations, the authority shall pledge or assign as security therefor:

Payments received on student loans including principal, interest and penalties and other income rendered in connection with student loans;

Proceeds of insurance, earnings and profits on investments of funds and from sales, purchases, endorsements of student loans and other contract rights;

Any funds, rights, proceeds of insurance or other benefits acquired pursuant to any federal law or contract to the extent not in conflict therewith;

Money recovered through the enforcement of any remedies or rights; and

Any other funds or things of value becoming the property of the authority, which in the determination of the authority, may enhance the marketability of its revenue obligations.

The holders of obligations shall not look to any general or other fund for payment of the obligations except the revenues pledged or assigned under subsection (a) of this section.

Revenue obligations shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt of the state within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation. The obligations shall not be considered or held to be general, special or limited obligations of the state but shall constitute the special obligations of the authority for which the state shall not pledge its full faith and credit for payment on the obligations.

The resolution or trust indenture under which the revenue obligations are authorized and any other instrument may contain agreements and provisions for:

The creation and maintenance of special funds from revenues; and

The rights and remedies available in the event of default.

Each pledge, agreement or other instrument made for the benefit or security of any obligations of the authority is valid and binding from the time made. The revenues, receipts, monies and assets pledged are immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without delivery or further act. The lien is valid and binding against persons having claims of any kind against the authority whether or not the persons have actual notice of the lien. Neither the resolution nor the indenture or other instrument by which a pledge is created need be recorded or filed.

Any resolution or trust indenture under which obligations of the authority are authorized may contain provisions for vesting in a trustee the properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the authority determines.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-709.
Debt service reserve funds; use of monies.

Unless otherwise provided in the resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of particular obligations, the monies held in or credited to any debt service reserve fund established under this section shall be used solely for:

Payment of the principal of obligations of the authority secured by the reserve fund, as the obligations mature or are redeemed prior to maturity;

Purchase of the obligations of the authority;

Payment of interest on the obligations of the authority; or

Payment of any redemption premium required to be paid when the obligations are redeemed prior to maturity.

The interest earned on the amount deposited in any reserve fund may be used for defraying the cost of the operations of the authority. Money in any debt service reserve fund shall not be withdrawn if it would reduce the amount of the fund to less than the amount which is pledged in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the obligations secured by the debt service reserve fund, except for paying principal and interest on obligations maturing and becoming due and for the payment of which other monies of the authority are not available.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-710.
Disposition of monies received.

Monies received pursuant to this article, whether as proceeds from the sale of obligations or as revenues, receipts or income, shall be held as trust funds to be applied solely as provided in the proceedings under which the obligations are authorized. The trustee shall hold and apply the monies for purposes authorized by this article and by the proceedings authorizing the obligations and included in the resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the obligations.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-711.
Notice of default; authority to pay unpaid balance of principal to financial institutions; financial institutions to deliver note to authority.

The authority shall establish and at all times maintain one (1) or more adequate reserve funds to provide for defaults on student loans financed pursuant to this article. All financial institutions offering loans to be financed pursuant to this article and the authority, on all loans made directly to students pursuant to this article, shall charge a loan reserve fee of not more than five percent (5%) of the total face amount of the loan. The authority may from time to time decrease this percentage in furtherance of this plan. In order for a loan to qualify for default coverage by the authority under this article, the financial institution shall deposit the loan reserve fee into reserve funds established by the authority under this section. The authority shall establish procedures for the collection and deposit of the loan reserve fee and for the payment of defaults on secured loans. The loan reserve fee is not a finance charge for purposes of any state or federal consumer credit law.

In the event of a default on any loan owned by the authority or security obligation of the authority, the authority shall take all lawful steps to collect on all loans acquired, administered or financed pursuant to this article and in accordance with commercially reasonable terms and subject to any applicable state or federal statutes, may contract with a private collection agent for loan collection.

In the event of a default on any loan not owned by the authority but administered or financed pursuant to this article, the authority shall as soon as practicable after receipt of demand by a financial institution containing a statement of the nature and the reason for the default, pay, from the loan reserve funds established pursuant to this article, to the financial institution one hundred percent (100%) of the unpaid balance of the principal on the note. Upon payment, the financial institution shall endorse, without recourse or warranty, and deliver to the authority the note, together with all of the rights of the financial institution under any guaranty or endorsement of the note and with respect to any security for the payment of the note.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-712.
Age discrimination prohibited; full legal capacity of minors.

Any student qualifying for a loan under this article is not disqualified by reason of being a minor. For the purpose of applying for, receiving and repaying a loan, any student has full legal capacity to act and all the rights, powers, privileges and obligations of an adult with respect thereto.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of state law to age discrimination in employment, 51 ALR5th 1.

§ 21-16-713.
Information sharing.

Colleges in this state shall furnish to the authority and to financial institutions information necessary to properly administer this article. Upon request, the authority may regularly furnish information on higher education student loan transactions to colleges.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-714.
Investment of state funds in insured, guaranteed or other higher education loans.

Subject to approval of the governor and advice of the attorney general, the state treasurer may enter into standby commitment agreements for a commercially reasonable fee with the authority under which the state agrees to purchase loans held by the authority at any time the authority is unable to pay interest on or principal of any of its outstanding obligations on any regularly scheduled interest or principal payment date, or at maturity, whether by acceleration, redemption or otherwise. One (1) condition of the agreement shall require the loan program to be designed for statewide participation and benefits. If the commitment is incurred, the investment shall be made from the Wyoming permanent mineral trust fund or permanent land fund and shall not exceed one hundred seventy-five million dollars ($175,000,000.00).

If loans are sold, the authority shall, as partial consideration for the sale, retain the responsibility for collection and procedural processing of the loans at its sole expense with the exception of servicing fees as specified in the standby commitment agreement. In no case shall the state be obliged to administer loans purchased from the authority. The portion of any payment reflecting a return of corpus shall be credited to the permanent mineral trust fund or permanent land fund and the balance of the payment shall be credited to the general fund or the permanent land income fund, as applicable.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1; 1997, ch. 108, § 1; 2016 ch. 110, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in the last sentence of (a), deleted “investment under this article, when combined with investment made under W.S.

21-16-113

,” and made a stylistic change.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 110, § 4 states as follows: “(a)
This act shall apply to all loans, contracts, agreements and other obligations entered into on and after the effective date of this act. (b)
Nothing in this act shall be construed to modify or impair existing contracts or other obligations of the state of Wyoming executed prior to the effective date of this act."

§ 21-16-715.
Exemptions from taxation; exceptions.

The exercise of the powers granted by this article constitutes the performance of an essential governmental function. The authority shall not be required to pay any taxes levied by any municipality or political subdivision of the state upon its projects, property or monies, other than assessments for local improvements. The authority shall not be required to pay state taxes of any kind. Except for estate taxes, property, monies and any obligations issued under this article including the income therefrom, shall be free from taxation of every kind by the state, municipalities and political subdivisions of the state.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-716.
Obligations as legal investments.

The obligations of the authority are legal investments which may be used as collateral for public funds of the state, insurance companies, financial institutions, savings and loan associations, investment companies, trustees and other fiduciaries which may properly and legally invest funds in their control or belonging to them in obligations of the authority.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-717.
State pledge not to impair rights and remedies of holders of obligations.

The state pledges to the holders of any obligations issued under this article that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of agreements made with the holders, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders until the obligations, together with interest, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of the holders, are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge of the state in any agreement with the holders of the obligations.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-718.
Investment and management of funds; audit.

In investing and managing its funds, the authority shall exercise the judgment and care which persons of prudence, discretion and intelligence would exercise under similar circumstances in managing the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income and the probable safety of their capital, and may:

Invest funds in securities in which state funds may be invested as provided by law or in savings certificates of savings and loan associations and certificates of deposit of financial institutions to the extent they are fully insured by a federal agency or are fully secured by a pledge of assets as provided by law;

Sell securities it has purchased; and

Deposit funds in any financial institution if secured by obligations authorized as permissible security for state investments.

Notwithstanding this section, the authority may contract with the holders of any of its obligations for the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any monies of the authority, of any monies held in trust or otherwise for the payment of obligations and may carry out the contract. Monies held in trust or otherwise for the payment of obligations or in any way to secure obligations and deposits of monies may be secured in the same manner as monies of the authority and all financial institutions and trust companies are authorized to give security for these deposits.

Subject to agreements with holders of its obligations, the authority shall prescribe a system of accounts in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

The authority shall employ a certified public accountant to examine the books and accounts of the authority including its receipts, disbursements, contracts, reserve funds, sinking funds, investments and any other matters relating to its financial standing. The examination shall be conducted at least once each year and copies of the examination report shall be filed with the secretary of state, the director of the state department of audit and the legislative service office.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-719.
Assistance by state agencies.

Upon request of the authority, any state agency may temporarily assign to the authority officers and employees necessary to assist the authority in carrying out its functions and duties under this article. Assigned state officers and employees shall not lose status or rights as state employees.

Upon request of the authority, any state agency may lend technical assistance, render advice and attend meetings with the directors and employees of the authority as the authority requires in carrying out its functions and duties.

The authority shall compensate the state for any assistance received.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-720.
Annual report and budget.

The authority shall submit an annual report in the manner provided by W.S.

9-2-1014

.

The authority shall submit its budget for review as provided by W.S.

9-2-1010

through

9-2-1014

.1.

This section shall not impair or affect any pledge of special funds of the authority for payment of obligations authorized under this article nor shall any funds of the authority be deemed state funds and subject to appropriation hereby.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “9-2-1014.1” for “9-2-1015.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-16-721.
Conflicts of interest.

The authority shall not purchase from, sell to, borrow from, loan to, contract with or otherwise deal with any corporation, trust, association, partnership or other entity in which any director of the authority has a financial interest.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, this section does not prohibit:

Buying, selling or placing higher education loans with financial institutions in which a director has a financial interest; or

Contracting with a Wyoming corporation for the provision of services if one (1) or more directors of the corporation is also a member of the board.

Representations specified under subsection (b) of this section shall be adequately disclosed and any contracts or agreements shall be commercially reasonable. Any financial interest shall be disclosed in the minutes of the authority.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.

§ 21-16-722.
Inspection of financial records.

The director of the department of audit or his designee may at any time inspect and examine the books, financial accounts and financial records of the authority.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 118, § 1.